Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 6 Planning and Development

45-12-200.
Legislative findings and purpose.

Coordinated and comprehensive planning by all levels of government within the State of Georgia is of vital importance to the state and its citizens. The state has an essential public interest in promoting, developing, sustaining, and assisting coordinated and comprehensive planning by all levels of government. This article is intended to provide for the coordination of planning, at the direction of the Governor, by departments, agencies, commissions, and other institutions of the state, and this article shall be liberally construed to achieve that end.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Wetlands:
Values, Trends, and Legal Status,” see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 791 (1990).

45-12-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Council” means the Governor’s Development Council.

“Planning” means the process of determining actions which state agencies shall take.

“State agency” means any department, agency, commission, or other institution of the executive branch of the government of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1.

45-12-202.
Governor’s Development Council created.

The Governor’s Development Council is created in the office of the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1.

45-12-203.
Council membership; chair; meetings.

The members of the board of directors of the Georgia Regional Transportation Authority provided by Code Section 50-32-4, upon their initial appointment and thereafter, shall constitute the membership of the council. Membership on that authority or the council shall not constitute an appointment to an office of honor or trust for purposes of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-32-4.

The chair of the Georgia Regional Transportation Authority shall serve as the chair of the council.

The council shall hold meetings as often as the chair determines, but not more than 12 days each year. The chair may call special meetings upon adequate written, personal, telephone, or facsimile notice to members of the council. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for conducting business. No member may act through a proxy, designee, or delegate. The council may establish, from time to time, such additional rules and procedures as the council deems appropriate for conducting the council’s business. These rules and procedures may be established in bylaws or in such other form as the council deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2039, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1399, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 112, § 5.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (1999).

45-12-204.
Powers and duties of council.

The council, at the direction of the Governor and subject to this article, shall perform the following functions:

Advise the Governor on the state’s economic development policy;

Coordinate, supervise, and review planning by state agencies. This shall include, but shall not be limited to, coordination of long-range planning and coordination of the location and construction of public facilities on the basis of state, regional, and local considerations identified in the comprehensive state-wide plan developed by the Governor with the assistance of the Department of Community Affairs; and

Establish procedures for, and take action to require, communication and coordination among state agencies in any respect which the council deems necessary or appropriate in order to further the coordination of planning by state agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2039, § 2.

45-12-205.
Attachment to Department of Community Affairs; technical support.

The council shall be attached to the Department of Community Affairs for administrative purposes. The Department of Community Affairs and the Office of Planning and Budget shall provide technical support to the council as directed by the chair and approved by the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2039, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1399, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 112, § 6.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (1999).

45-12-206.
Cooperation of state agencies, counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions with council.

All state agencies and all counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions of the state, regional commissions, and other public agencies or public authorities shall have the power and authority to take all actions which may be necessary or appropriate to respond to inquiries and requests from the council, to cooperate with the council in carrying out its duties, and otherwise to take any action which the Governor or the council may direct or require in carrying out their duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 22/HB 1216.

45-12-207.
Construction of article.

The provisions of this article shall not be construed so as to permit an agency to initiate, carry out, fail to perform, or otherwise take actions in any manner which is not authorized by law applicable to such agency or the subject matter. The provisions of this article shall not be construed so as to authorize an agency to locate, fail to locate, construct, or fail to construct public projects or facilities in any manner which is inconsistent with the directives of the General Assembly as specified in the authorization of such public projects or facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-207

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 1.1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.